lt-LT: Pluošto paruošimo tipas: Meninis kuodelis (maišytas / tekstūruotas); Karštas kuodelis; Būgnu karštas kuodelis; Adatomis muštas kuodelis; Išankstinio vėlimo lakštas; Kita
zh-CN: 纤维预处理类型: 艺术毛毡（混合/纹理）; 梳理毛毡; 鼓式梳理毛毡; 针刺毛毡; 预制毡片; 其他
fi: Kuidun valmistustyyppi: Taidelevy (sekoitettu/teksturoitu); Karstalevy; Rumpukarstattu levy; Neulattu levy; Esihuopalevy; Muu
ja: 繊維準備タイプ: アートバット (混紡/テクスチャ); カーデッドバット; ドラムカードバット; ニードルパンチバット; プレフェルトシート; その他
sk-SK: Typ prípravy vlákien: Umelecké rúno (zmiešané/štruktúrované); Mykané rúno; Bubnovo mykané rúno; Vpichované rúno; Plát predplsti; Iné
hu: Szálelőkészítés típusa: Művész kártolt bunda (kevert/strukturált); Kártolt bunda; Dobkártolt bunda; Tűnemezelt bunda; Előnemezelt lap; Egyéb
nl: Vezel voorbereiding type: Art batt (gemengd/getextureerd); Gekaarde batt; Met molen gekaarde batt; Naaldgeponste batt; Voorviltvel; Overig
tr: Elyaf hazırlama türü: Art batt (harmanlanmış/dokulu); Taraklanmış batt; Tamburlu taraklanmış batt; İğnelenmiş batt; Ön keçe tabakası; Diğer
th: ประเภทการเตรียมเส้นใย: อาร์ตแบท (ผสม/มีเท็กซ์เจอร์); แบทผ่านการสาง; แบทผ่านการสางด้วยเครื่องแบบดรัม; แบทแบบย้ำเข็ม; แผ่นพรีเฟลต์; อื่นๆ
de: Art der Faseraufbereitung: Art Batt (gemischt/strukturiert); Kardiertes Vlies; Trommelkardiertes Vlies; Nadelgestanztes Vlies; Vorfilz-Platte; Sonstige
pl: Typ przygotowania włókna: Art batt (mieszany/teksturowany); Batt zgrzeblony; Batt zgrzeblony bębnowo; Batt igłowany; Arkusz prefeltu; Inne
ru: Тип подготовки волокна: Арт-батт (смешанный/текстурированный); Кардочесанный батт; Батт (на кардере барабанного типа); Иглопробивной батт; Лист префельта; Другое
el: Τύπος παρασκευής ινών: Βάτα art batt (σύμμεικτη/με υφή); Λαναρισμένη βάτα; Βάτα λαναρισμένη σε τύμπανο; Βάτα από needle-punching (τρυπητή); Φύλλο από προσυμπιεσμένο φελτ (prefelt); Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul de preparare a fibrelor: Strat artistic (amestec/texturat); Strat cardat; Strat cardat la tambur; Strat interțesut (needle-punched); Foaie de prefelt; Altele
en: Fiber preparation type: Art batt (blended/textured); Carded batt; Drum-carded batt; Needle-punched batt; Prefelt sheet; Other
ko: 섬유 가공 형태: 아트 배트(혼방/질감); 카디드 배트; 드럼 카드 배트; 니들 펀치 배트; 프리펠트 시트; 기타
zh-TW: 纖維準備類型: 藝術梳棉 (混合/紋理); 梳理毛片; 滾筒梳理毛片; 針刺毛片; 預氈片; 其他
sv: Typ av fiberberedning: Konstkardflor (blandat/strukturerat); Kardflor; Kardflor från kardmaskin; Nålfiltat kardflor; Förfiltad duk; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de preparação de fibra: Manta artística (mesclada/texturizada); Manta cardada; Manta cardada em tambor; Manta agulhada; Folha pré-feltro; Outro
es: Tipo de preparación de fibra: Capa artística (mezclada/texturizada); Capa cardada; Capa cardada en tambor; Capa perforada con aguja; Lámina de prefieltro; Otro
nb: Type fiberpreparering: Kunstkardeflak (blandet/teksturert); Kardeflak; Kardeflak fra kardemaskin; Nålet kardeflak; Forfilt-ark; Annet
da: Type fiberforberedelse: Art batt (blandet/tekstureret); Kardet flor; Tromlekardet flor; Nålefiltet flor; Forfilt-ark; Andet
vi: Loại chuẩn bị sợi: Batt nghệ thuật (pha trộn/có kết cấu); Batt chải thô; Batt chải thô bằng máy trụ; Batt đục kim; Tấm xốp len; Khác
it: Tipo di preparazione della fibra: Materassino artistico (misto/strutturato); Materassino cardato; Materassino cardato a rullo; Materassino agugliato; Foglio di prefeltro; Altra
bg-BG: Тип подготовка на влакното: Арт бат (смесен/текстуриран); Дарачен бат; Бат от барабанен дарак; Иглонабит бат; Лист от преплъст; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta pripreme vlakana: Umjetničko runo (miješano/teksturirano); Grebenano runo; Strojno grebenano runo; Igličano runo; Polufilc; Ostalo
fr: Type de préparation de la fibre: Nappe artistique (mélangée/texturée); Nappe cardée; Nappe cardée à rouleaux; Nappe aiguilletée; Plaque de pré-feutre; Autre
pt-PT: tipo de preparação de fibras: Manta artística (mista/texturada); Manta cardada; Manta cardada em tambor; Manta perfurada com agulha; Folha de pré-feltro; Outro
cs: Typ přípravy vlákna: Umělecké rouno (art batt); Mykané rouno; Na bubnu mykané rouno; Vpichované rouno; Arch předplsti; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta priprave vlaken: Umetniška koprena (mešana/teksturirana); Mikana koprena; Strojno mikana koprena; Iglana koprena; Predklobučevina v poli; Drugo